Idaho, session 2025, H0303.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 14, Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 6-1411, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
6-1411. SATISFACTION OF A WARNING TO CONSUMERS OR THE PUBLIC. (1) The
common law duty of a United States manufacturer or seller of a product that
is used in growing food or fiber to warn a consumer or the public about the
risks associated with the use of the product shall be presumed to be satis-
fied when:
(a) An Idaho or federal statute, rule, regulation, or government order
issued thereunder requires a manufacturer or seller to provide a warn-
ing to accompany the sale or use of a product;
(b) The authority requiring such warning provides or approves a spe-
cific warning that is based on scientific evaluation of the risks of us-
ing that product; and
(c) Such warning is actually given as required by statute, rule, or reg-
ulation.
(2)(a) Such presumption can be rebutted only by a showing that:
(i) The clear weight of scientific evidence does not support the
scientific basis on which the required warning is based; and
(ii) The manufacturer or seller knows or should have known at the
time the product was sold that the required warning was not sup-
ported by the clear weight of scientific evidence.
(b) At minimum, evidence that the warning provided is not adequate
shall be academically peer reviewed, published in a recognized academic
journal, capable of replication, and reflect a reliable application of
scientific principles and methods to the risks associated with the use
of the product.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.